Hawaii statutes.
§560:5-607 Hearing. (a) The court
shall set a hearing on the petition and shall order that notice of the time and
place of hearing be provided to the ward, the guardian, and the guardian ad
litem for the ward and any other persons that the court may designate.

(b) The ward shall be entitled to be present
at the hearing and to see and hear all evidence bearing on the petition. The
ward shall be entitled to be represented by an attorney, in addition to the
court-appointed guardian ad litem, to present evidence, and to cross-examine
witnesses, including any person submitting a report. The ward may be absent
from the hearing if the ward is unwilling or is unable to participate. [L 1986,
c 81, pt of §2; am L 2006, c 25, §3]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next